Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1825
Violations; penalties.

(1) Any person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association, or officer or member thereof who (a) destroys or alters any official certificate, (b) ships or attempts to ship any potatoes out of any designated area where compulsory inspection is maintained without first obtaining a special permit or without first complying with section 2-1816, or (c) violates any other provision of the Nebraska Potato Inspection Act or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder for which no specific penalty is provided shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) Any inspector or agent of the director who fails to remit to the department all fees collected in his or her official capacity shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(3) Any person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association, or officer or member thereof who forges or counterfeits any official inspection legend or official certificate adopted by the director for use under the Nebraska Potato Inspection Act or who, not being an inspector or appointed agent of the director, attaches any certificate of inspection whether or not forged or counterfeited to any commercial shipment of potatoes shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 17, p. 191;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 19;

Laws 1987, LB 20, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 5.